District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “2607 Connecticut Avenue NW and 4111 Kansas Avenue NW Timeline
Extension and Tax Forgiveness Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Notwithstanding D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.03(b), if the Office of Tax and
Revenue certifies that the real property located at 2607 Connecticut Avenue NW, and known for
tax and assessment purposes as Lot 151 in Square 2204 (“Property”), meets each of the
requirements for property tax exemption under D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.03(b)(1)-(6) by
September 30, 2026, all real property and recordation taxes assessed, including any accrued
interest and penalties, with respect to the Property beginning on January 23, 2023, shall be
forgiven, and any payments made shall be refunded to the person who made the payment;
provided, that the total refund shall not exceed $506,627.
Sec. 3. Notwithstanding D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.03(b), if the Office of Tax and
Revenue certifies that the real property located at 4111 Kansas Avenue, NW, and known for tax
and assessment purposes as Lots 2001 through 2045 in Square 2910 (“Property”), meets each of
the requirements for property tax exemption under D.C. Official Code § 47-1005.03(b)(1)-(6)
within 48 months after SOME Inc., acquired the Property, all real property and recordation taxes
assessed, including any accrued interest and penalties, with respect to the Property beginning on
May 21, 2022, shall be forgiven, and any payments made shall be refunded to the person who
made the payment.
Sec. 4. Applicability.
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
(a) Section 3 shall apply upon the date of inclusion of its fiscal effect in an approved
budget and financial plan.
(b) The Chief Financial Officer shall certify the date of the inclusion of the fiscal effect in
an approved budget and financial plan and provide notice to the Budget Director of the Council
of the certification.
(c)(1) The Budget Director shall cause the notice of the certification to be published in
the District of Columbia Register.
(2) The date of publication of the notice of the certification shall not affect the
applicability of the provision identified in subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 5. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 6. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2